District of Columbia statutes.
1-608.57

Continuing legal education; management supervisory skills maintenance and enhancement; accountability standards and plans.

(a)

(1)

Attorneys in the Legal Service, other than attorneys employed by independent agencies, shall participate in an annual mandatory program of continuing legal education. The Attorney General shall establish a program for attorneys employed by the Office of the Attorney General, and the Director of the Mayor’s Office of Legal Counsel shall establish a program for attorneys employed by the subordinate agencies and the Mayor’s Office of Legal Counsel.

(2)

Training programs offered by the Office of the Attorney General shall, to the extent practicable, be made available with no charge to attorneys employed by the subordinate agencies; likewise, training programs offered by the Mayor’s Office of Legal Counsel for attorneys employed by the subordinate agencies shall, to the extent practicable, be made available with no charge to attorneys in the Office of the Attorney General.

(3)

Attorneys in the Legal Service who supervise one or more other attorneys as part of their normal duties shall maintain and enhance their management and supervisory skills through at least annual in-house or other training arranged or approved by their employing agency.

(b)

The Attorney General and the Director of the Mayor’s Office of Legal Counsel shall each develop and establish performance management systems that include accountability standards and individual accountability plans for all attorneys, including Senior Executive Attorneys, in the Legal Service who are under their direction, supervision, or control. The performance management systems shall link pay to performance.

(c)

The head of an independent agency that employs attorneys in the Legal Service shall develop and establish a performance management system that includes accountability standards and individual accountability plans for all attorneys in the Legal Service who are under their direction and control. The head of an independent agency may utilize a system developed for use by the Attorney General or the Director of the Mayor’s Office of Legal Counsel for attorneys under the independent agency head’s direction or control. The performance management system shall link pay to performance.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 857
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-260, § 2(j), 46 DCR 1318
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 3012(g), 52 DCR 7503
Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-60, § 101(g), 60 DCR 15487
1981 Ed., § 1-609.57.
D.C. Law 16-33 substituted “Attorney General” for “Corporation Counsel”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-60 rewrote the section.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 1-608.51.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3012(g) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, Jan. 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-155, § 1014(c), see § 7002 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-60: Section 401(a) of D.C. Law 20-60 provided that § 101 of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-60: Section 1013 of D.C. Law 20-155 amended D.C. Law 20-60 to provide that D.C. Law 20-60, §  101, shall apply as of October 1, 2018; Section 1014(b) of D.C. Law 20-155 amended D.C. Law 20-60 to provide that D.C. Law 20-60, §  101, shall apply as of October 1, 2014.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-155: Section 1014(c) of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that § 1014 of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7002 of D.C. Law 21-36 repealed D.C. Law 20-155, §  1014(c).